Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5249.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 20920. (1) A person shall not establish, operate, or cause to be operated an ambulance operation unless the ambulance operation is licensed under this section. (2) Upon proper application and payment of a $100.00 fee, the department shall issue a license as an ambulance operation to a person who meets the requirements of this part and the rules promulgated under this part. (3) An applicant shall specify in the application each ambulance to be operated. (4) An ambulance operation license shall specify the ambulances licensed to be operated. (5) An ambulance operation license shall state the highest level of life support the ambulance operation is licensed to provide. An ambulance operation shall operate in accordance with this part, rules promulgated under this part, and approved medical control authority protocols and, except as provided in section 20921a(2), shall not provide life support at a level that exceeds its license and available licensed personnel or violates approved medical control authority protocols. (6) An ambulance operation license may be renewed annually upon application to the department and payment of a $100.00 renewal fee. Before issuing a renewal license, the department shall determine that the ambulance operation is in compliance with this part, the rules promulgated under this part, and medical control authority protocols. (7) Beginning on July 22, 1997, an ambulance operation that meets all of the following requirements may apply for an ambulance operation upgrade license under subsection (8): (a) On or before July 22, 1997, holds an ambulance operation license that designates the ambulance operation either as a transporting basic life support service or as a transporting limited advanced life support service. (b) Is a transporting basic life support service, that is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances for the transport of emergency patients at a life support level higher than basic life support, or is a transporting limited advanced life support service, that is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances for the transport of emergency patients at the life support level of advanced life support. (c) Is owned or operated by or under contract to a local governmental unit and providing first-line emergency medical response to that local governmental unit on or before July 22, 1997. (d) Will provide the services described in subdivision (b) only to the local governmental unit described in subdivision (c), and only in response to a 9-1-1 call or other call for emergency transport. (8) An ambulance operation meeting the requirements of subsection (7) that applies for an ambulance operation upgrade license shall include all of the following information in the application provided by the department: (a) Verification of all of the requirements of subsection (7) including, but not limited to, a description of the staffing and equipment to be used in providing the higher level of life support services. (b) If the applicant is a transporting basic life support service, a plan of action to upgrade from providing basic life support to providing limited advanced life support or advanced life support to take place over a period of not more than 2 years. If the applicant is a transporting limited advanced life support service, a plan of action to upgrade from providing limited advanced life support to providing advanced life support to take place over a period of not more than 2 years. (c) The medical control authority protocols for the ambulance operation upgrade license, along with a recommendation from the medical control authority under which the ambulance operation operates that the ambulance operation upgrade license be issued by the department. (d) Other information required by the department. (9) The statewide emergency medical services coordination committee shall review the information described in subsection (8)(c) and make a recommendation to the department as to whether or not an ambulance operation upgrade license should be granted to the applicant. (10) Upon receipt of a completed application as required under subsection (8), a positive recommendation under subsection (9), and payment of a $100.00 fee, the department shall issue to the applicant an ambulance operation upgrade license. Subject to subsection (12), the license is valid for 2 years from the date of issuance and is renewable for 1 additional 2-year period. An application for renewal of an ambulance operation upgrade license must contain documentation of the progress made on the plan of action described in subsection (8)(b). In addition, the medical control authority under which the ambulance operation operates shall annually file with the statewide emergency medical services coordination committee a written report on the progress made by the ambulance operation on the plan of action described in subsection (8)(b), including, but not limited to, information on training, equipment, and personnel. (11) If an ambulance operation is designated by its regular license as providing basic life support services, then an ambulance operation upgrade license issued under this section allows the ambulance operation to provide limited advanced life support services or advanced life support services when the ambulance operation is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances to provide services at the higher levels. If an ambulance operation is designated by its regular license as providing limited advanced life support services, then an ambulance operation upgrade license issued under this section allows the ambulance operation to provide advanced life support services when the ambulance operation is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances to provide services at the higher level. An ambulance operation shall not provide services under an ambulance operation upgrade license unless the medical control authority under which the ambulance operation operates has adopted protocols for the ambulance operation upgrade license regarding quality monitoring procedures, use and protection of equipment, and patient care. (12) The department may revoke or fail to renew an ambulance operation upgrade license for a violation of this part or a rule promulgated under this part or for failure to comply with the plan of action filed under subsection (8)(b). An ambulance operation that obtains an ambulance operation upgrade license must annually renew its regular license under subsections (2) to (6). An ambulance operationâs regular license is not affected by the following: (a) The fact that the ambulance operation has obtained or renewed an ambulance operation upgrade license. (b) The fact that an ambulance operationâs ambulance operation upgrade license is revoked or is not renewed under this subsection. (c) The fact that the ambulance operationâs ambulance operation upgrade license expires at the end of the second 2-year period prescribed by subsection (10). (13) Beginning 6 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection, an ambulance operation that meets all of the following requirements may apply for an ambulance operation adaptive care license under subsection (14): (a) Holds an ambulance operation license that designates the ambulance operation as a transporting basic life support service. (b) Was a transporting basic life support service on or before October 1, 2022. (c) Is a transporting basic life support service that is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances for the transport of emergency patients at a life support level higher than basic life support. (d) Is owned or operated by or under contract to a local governmental unit and is designated by that local governmental unit as the ambulance operation providing transporting service to that local governmental unit. (e) Will provide the services described in subdivision (c) only to the local governmental unit described in subdivision (d), and only in response to a 9-1-1 call or other call for emergency transport. (14) An ambulance operation meeting the requirements of subsection (13) that applies for an ambulance operation adaptive care license shall include all of the following information in the application provided by the department: (a) Verification of all of the requirements of subsection (13), including, but not limited to, a description of the staffing and equipment to be used in providing the higher level of life support services. (b) The medical control authority protocols for the ambulance operation adaptive care license, along with a recommendation from the medical control authority under which the ambulance operation operates that the ambulance operation adaptive care license be issued by the department. (c) Other information required by the department. (15) The statewide emergency medical services coordination committee shall review the information described in subsection (14) and make a recommendation to the department as to whether or not an ambulance operation adaptive care license should be granted to the applicant. (16) Upon receipt of a completed application as required under subsection (14) and a positive recommendation under subsection (15), the department shall issue to the applicant an ambulance operation adaptive care license. Subject to subsection (18), the ambulance operation adaptive care license is valid for 4 years from the date of issuance. (17) An ambulance operation adaptive care license issued under this section allows the ambulance operation to provide limited advanced life support services when the ambulance operation is able to staff and equip 1 or more ambulances to provide services at the limited advanced life support level. An ambulance operation shall not provide services under an ambulance operation adaptive care license unless the medical control authority under which the ambulance operation operates has adopted protocols for the ambulance operation adaptive care license regarding quality monitoring procedures, use and protection of equipment, and patient care. (18) The department may revoke or fail to renew an ambulance operation adaptive care license for a violation of this part or a rule promulgated under this part. An ambulance operation that obtains an ambulance operation adaptive care license must annually renew its regular license under subsections (2) to (6). An ambulance operationâs regular license is not affected by the following: (a) The fact that the ambulance operation has obtained or renewed an ambulance operation adaptive care license. (b) The fact that an ambulance operationâs ambulance operation adaptive care license is revoked or is not renewed under this subsection. (c) The fact that the ambulance operationâs ambulance operation adaptive care license expires as prescribed under subsection (16). This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor